Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.540.090

Nonhigh districts, time of levy and issuance of bonds.

If the voters of a nonhigh school district approve an excess tax levy, the levy shall be made at the earliest time permitted by law. If the voters of a nonhigh school district approve the issuance of bonds, the board of directors of the nonhigh school district shall issue and sell said bonds within ninety days after receiving a copy of a resolution of the board of directors of the high school district that the high school district is ready to proceed with the construction of the high school facilities provided for in the plan and requesting the sale of the bonds.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.075. Prior: 1959 c 262 s 9. Formerly RCW 28A.56.075, 28.56.075.]